Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB736.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6893YC (1) 91 sb/js H.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 455B.241 Definitions. 1 As used in this part 3 of subchapter III, unless the context 2 otherwise requires: 3 1. âAerobic treatment unitâ means a disposal system 4 employing bacterial action that is maintained by the 5 utilization of air or oxygen and includes the aeration plant 6 and equipment and the method of final effluent disposal. 7 2. âCertified technicianâ means a person who is certified 8 in accordance with the manufacturer to monitor, maintain, and 9 inspect the system. 10 3. âClass A proprietary treatment systemâ or âclass A systemâ 11 means a media-based or passive secondary treatment system 12 including but not limited to a peat moss biofilter, coconut 13 fiber filter, synthetic foam filter, polystyrene bead media 14 filter, or textile filter. 15 4. âClass B proprietary treatment systemâ or âclass B systemâ 16 means a secondary treatment system that relies on mechanical 17 aeration or fixed film processes. 18 5. âPacked bed media filterâ means a watertight structure 19 filled with uniformly sized media that is normally placed over 20 an underdrain system. The wastewater is dosed onto the surface 21 of the media through a distribution network and is allowed to 22 percolate through the media to the underdrain system. The 23 underdrain collects the filtrate and discharges the final 24 effluent. 25 6. âPrivate sewage disposal systemâ means a system that 26 provides for the treatment or disposal of domestic sewage from 27 four or fewer dwelling units or the equivalent of less than 28 sixteen individuals on a continuing basis, including domestic 29 waste, whether residential or nonresidential, but not including 30 industrial waste of any flow rate except as provided for in 31 567 IAC 68.8. âPrivate sewage disposal systemâ includes but is 32 not limited to a septic tank, holding tank for waste, chemical 33 toilet, impervious vault toilet, or portable toilet. 34 7. âProprietary treatment systemâ means either a class A or 35 -1- LSB 6893YC (1) 91 sb/js 1/ 5 H.F. _____ class B system. 1 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 455B.242 Monitoring and maintenance 2 requirements. 3 1. Prior to the installation of a private sewage disposal 4 system, the owner shall enter a monitoring and maintenance 5 contract with a certified technician. The contract shall be 6 required for the life of the system, and a copy of the contract 7 shall be provided to the county sanitarian. 8 2. A private sewage disposal system shall be inspected, 9 monitored, and maintained in accordance with the manufacturerâs 10 specifications. However, a class A system shall be inspected 11 at least annually. A class B system shall be inspected at 12 least twice per year or more frequently if required by the 13 manufacturerâs specifications. 14 3. All monitoring and maintenance shall be performed by 15 a certified technician. A certified technician shall report 16 results to the system owner and to the county sanitarian. All 17 inspections shall be performed by the county sanitarian and 18 such results shall be reported as required in section 455B.243. 19 4. For a class A proprietary treatment system, a media 20 filter such as a peat moss biofilter, coconut fiber filter, 21 synthetic foam filter, polystyrene bead media filter, or 22 textile filter may be used if the site is unacceptable for 23 a soil absorption system and an intermittent sand filter. 24 Preference should be given to the use of a class A system due 25 to the higher maintenance requirements of aerobic treatment 26 units and fixed film systems. An aerobic treatment unit may be 27 used only when the site is unacceptable for a soil absorption 28 system or an intermittent sand filter. Because of the higher 29 maintenance requirements of aerobic treatment units, preference 30 should be given to packed bed media filters where conditions 31 allow. 32 5. For a class B proprietary treatment system, an aerobic 33 treatment unit and modular fixed film system may only be used 34 when the site is unacceptable for a soil absorption system, 35 -2- LSB 6893YC (1) 91 sb/js 2/ 5 H.F. _____ intermittent sand filter, and class A system. A class B system 1 shall not be used for a vacation home, church, event facility, 2 or infrequent-use facility. 3 6. An aerobic treatment unit that discharges on the surface 4 of the ground shall have either an intermittently operated slow 5 sand filter or a free access sand filter on the discharge, with 6 both types of sand filters sized at a maximum of five gallons 7 per square foot of design flow. The free access sand filter 8 shall have a minimum of twenty-four inches of filter sand over 9 the top of a collection system. The free access sand filter 10 cover shall be easily opened to clean the sand surface. 11 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 455B.243 Reporting. 12 1. When a county sanitarian conducts an inspection of 13 a private sewage disposal system, at least the following 14 information shall be recorded: 15 a. The date of the review. 16 b. The type of proprietary treatment system. 17 c. Whether the system is functioning correctly or 18 functioning incorrectly. 19 d. If the system is functioning incorrectly, the primary 20 reason for the deficiency, including but not limited to: 21 (1) Improper installation. 22 (2) Lack of required maintenance. 23 (3) Failure to meet expected treatment performance. 24 2. The county sanitarian shall submit the information to the 25 department in the form and manner prescribed by the department. 26 3. The department shall compile the information and 27 shall maintain a publicly accessible database summarizing 28 inspection outcomes. The database shall not include personally 29 identifiable information. 30 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 455B.244 Rulemaking authority. 31 The department may adopt rules as necessary to administer 32 this part. 33 Sec. 5. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to the monitoring, 34 maintenance, and inspection of private sewage disposal systems, 35 -3- LSB 6893YC (1) 91 sb/js 3/ 5 H.F. _____ as defined in section 455B.241, as enacted by this Act, 1 installed on or after July 1, 2026. 2